Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0806.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 21224. (1) The hyperbaric oxygen therapy inspection fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money received from freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility licensing fees under section 20161 in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (4) The department shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, only for the purpose of inspecting freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facilities under this part. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a)    Senate Bill No. 803. (b)    Senate Bill No. 804. (c)    Senate Bill No. 805.